Maryland, session 2025, SB0107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0107*

SENATE BILL 107
10–401.
As used in this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated:
(13) “NONPROFIT CIVIL RIGHTS ORGANIZATION” MEANS:
(I) A QUALIFIED FAIR HOUSING ENFORCEMENT
ORGANIZATION OR A FAIR HOUSING ORGANIZATION AS DEFINED UNDER 24 C.F.R. §
125.103; OR
(II) AN ORGANIZATION INCORPORATED UNDER MARYLAND
LAW AS A PRIVATE, TAX–EXEMPT CIVIL RIGHTS ORGANIZATION THAT HAS AT LEAST
2 YEARS’ EXPERIENCE IN:
1. COMPLAINT INTAKE;
2. COMPLAINT INVESTIGATION; AND
3. TESTING FOR FAIR HOUSING VIOLATIONS OR
ENFORCEMENT OF MERITORIOUS CLAIMS.
[(13)] (14) (i) “Oral communication” means any conversation or words
spoken to or by any person in private conversation.
(ii) “Oral communication” does not include any electronic
communication.
[(14)] (15) “Person” means any employee or agent of this State or a political
subdivision thereof, and any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company,
trust, or corporation.
[(15)] (16) “Readily accessible to the general public” means, with respect to
a radio communication, that the communication is not:
(i) Scrambled or encrypted;
(ii) Transmitted using modulation techniques the essential
parameters of which have been withheld from the public with the intention of preserving
the privacy of the communication; or
(iii) Except for tone–only paging device communications, transmitted
over frequencies reserved for private use and licensed for private use under federal or State
law.
[(16)] (17) “Telephone solicitation theft” means conduct of a person that:

SENATE BILL 107 3
(i) Constitutes the offense of theft or attempted theft; and
(ii) Involves the use of a telephone to solicit the payment of money.
[(17)] (18) “User” means any person or entity that:
(i) Uses an electronic communication service; and
(ii) Is duly authorized by the provider of the service to engage in that
use.
[(18)] (19) “Wire communication” means any aural transfer made in whole
or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of
wire, cable, or other like connection between the point of origin and the point of reception
(including the use of a connection in a switching station) furnished or operated by any
person licensed to engage in providing or operating such facilities for the transmission of
communications.
10–402.
(c) (12) (I) IT IS LAWFUL UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERSON TO
INTERCEPT AN ORAL COMMUNICATION IF:
1. THE PERSON IS WORKING AS A FAIR HOUSING TESTER
FOR A FAIR HOUSING TESTING PROGRAM OPERATED BY:
A. THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT;
B. THE STATE;
C. A LOCAL GOVERNMENT; OR
D. A NONPROFIT CIVIL RIGHTS ORGANIZATION;
2. THE PERSON IS A PARTY TO THE COMMUNICATION;
AND
3. THE INTERCEPTION IS BEING MADE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF OBTAINING EVIDENCE OF A FAIR HOUSING VIOLATION UNDER
FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, NO PART OF THE CONTENTS OF THE INTERCEPTED COMMUNICATION
AND NO EVIDENCE DERIVED THEREFROM MAY BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE IN ANY
TRIAL, HEARING, OR OTHER PROCEEDING IN OR BEFORE ANY COURT, GRAND JURY,

SENATE BILL 107
DEPARTMENT, OFFICER, AGENCY, REGULATORY BODY, LEGISLATIVE COMMITTEE,
OR OTHER AUTHORITY OF THE STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE.
(III) THE CONTENTS OF AN INTERCEPTED ORAL
COMMUNICATION MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL FAIR HOUSING LAWS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.